en: Buckwheat product form: Boil-in-bag; Flakes; Flour; Grits; Hulled groats; Instant; Puffs; Quick-cooking; Roasted groats (kasha); Sprouted kernels; Whole (unhulled); Other
sv: Boveteproduktform: Boil-in-bag; Flingor; Mjöl; Gryn; Skalade korn; Snabblagad; Puffar; Snabbkokande; Rostade korn (kasha); Groddade korn; Hela (oskalade); Övrigt
tr: Karabuğday ürün formu: Poşette kaynatmalık; Lapa; Un; İrmik; Kabuksuz tane; Hazır; Puf; Hızlı pişen; Kavrulmuş tane (kaşa); Çimlendirilmiş tane; Bütün (kabuklu); Diğer
bg-BG: Продуктова форма на елда: За варене в пликче; Ядки; Брашно; Грис; Обелени зърна; Инстантна; Пукана; За бързо приготвяне; Печени зърна (каша); Покълнали зърна; Цяла (необелена); Друго
vi: Dạng sản phẩm kiều mạch: Luộc nguyên túi; Vảy; Bột; Tấm; Kiều mạch tách vỏ; Ăn liền; Hạt phồng; Nấu nhanh; Hạt rang (kasha); Hạt nảy mầm; Nguyên hạt (chưa tách vỏ); Khác
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka iz ajde: V vrečki za kuhanje; Kosmiči; Moka; Zdrob; Oluščena zrna; Instant; Ekspandirano; Hitra priprava; Pražena zrna (kaša); Kaljena zrna; Celo (neoluščeno); Drugo
hu: Hajdinatermék formája: Tasakban főzhető; Pehely; Liszt; Dara; Hántolt szem; Instant; Puffasztott; Gyorsfőzésű; Pirított szem (kása); Csíráztatott szemek; Egész (hántolatlan); Egyéb
it: forma del prodotto del grano saraceno: Da bollire in sacchetto; Fiocchi; Farina; Semola; Chicchi decorticati; Istantaneo; Soffiato; Cottura rapida; Chicchi arrostiti (kasha); Chicchi germogliati; Intero (non decorticato); Altro
nl: Boekweit productvorm: Kookzakje; Vlokken; Meel; Gries; Gepelde grutten; Instant; Puffs; Snelkook; Geroosterde grutten (kasha); Gekiemde korrels; Heel (ongepeld); Overig
es: Formato de producto de trigo sarraceno: En bolsa para hervir; Copos; Harina; Sémola; Granos pelados; Instantáneo; Inflado; De cocción rápida; Granos tostados (kasha); Granos germinados; Entero (sin pelar); Otro
nb: Bokhvete produktform: Kokepose; Flak; Mel; Gryn; Avskallede gryn; Hurtig; Puffet; Hurtigkokende; Ristede gryn (kasha); Spirede kjerner; Hele (med skall); Annet
pt-BR: Forma do produto de trigo sarraceno: Saquinho para ferver; Flocos; Farinha; Sêmola; Grãos descascados; Instantâneo; Expandido; Cozimento rápido; Grãos assados (kasha); Grãos brotados; Integral (com casca); Outros
fr: Format du produit à base de sarrasin: Sachet cuisson; Flocons; Farine; Gruau; Gruau décortiqué; Instantané; Soufflés; Cuisson rapide; Gruau grillé (kasha); Grains germés; Entier (non décortiqué); Autre
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์บัควีท: แบบต้มในถุง; เกล็ด; แป้ง; เมล็ดบดหยาบ; เมล็ดกะเทาะเปลือก; สำเร็จรูป; เมล็ดพอง; ปรุงสุกเร็ว; เมล็ดคั่ว (คาชา); เมล็ดเพาะงอก; ทั้งเมล็ด (ไม่กะเทาะเปลือก); อื่นๆ
cs: Forma pohankového produktu: Ve varném sáčku; Vločky; Mouka; Krupice; Loupané kroupy; Instantní; Křupky; Rychlovarné; Pražené kroupy (kasha); Naklíčená zrna; Celá (neloupaná); Jiné
sk-SK: Forma produktu z pohánky: Vo vrecku na varenie; Vločky; Múka; Krupica; Lúpané krúpy; Instantná; Pufovaná; Rýchlovarná; Pražené krúpy (kaša); Naklíčené zrná; Celá (nelúpaná); Iné
de: Form des Buchweizenprodukts: Kochbeutel; Flocken; Mehl; Grütze; Geschälte Graupen; Instant; Puffs; Schnellkochend; Geröstete Graupen (Kascha); Gekeimte Körner; Ganz (ungeschält); Sonstiges
zh-TW: 蕎麥商品形態: 袋裝水煮; 穀片; 穀粉; 碎粒; 脫殼去皮蕎麥; 即溶; 膨化; 快煮; 烘烤碎粒 (kasha); 發芽穀粒; 全穀 (未脫殼); 其他
el: Μορφή προϊόντος φαγόπυρου: Σε σακουλάκι για βράσιμο; Νιφάδες; Αλεύρι; Πλιγούρι; Αποφλοιωμένοι κόκκοι; Στιγμιαίο; Puffs; Γρήγορου μαγειρέματος; Καβουρδισμένοι κόκκοι (kasha); Φυτρωμένοι κόκκοι; Ολόκληρο (με το φλοιό); Άλλο
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda od heljde: Za kuhanje u vrećici; Pahuljice; Brašno; Krupica; Oljušteno zrno; Instant; Ekspandirano; Brzo kuhanje; Prženo zrno (kaša); Proklijala zrna; Cjelovito (neoljušteno); Ostalo
ro-RO: Formă produs din hrișcă: Fierbere în pungă; Fulgi; Făină; Păsat; Crupe decorticate; Instant; Pufuleți; Fierbere rapidă; Crupe prăjite (kasha); Boabe germinate; Întreg (nedecorticat); Altele
lt-LT: Grikių produkto forma: Verdami maišelyje; Dribsniai; Miltai; Kruopos; Lukštentos kruopos; Greitai paruošiami; Trapučiai; Greitai paruošiami; Skrudintos kruopos; Daiginti branduoliai; Sveiki (nelukštenti); Kita
fi: Tattarin tuotelomake: Keittopussi; Hiutaleet; Jauho; Suurimot; Kuoritut suurimot; Pikavalmisteinen; Puffatut; Pikakeitettävä; Paahdetut suurimot (kasha); Idätetyt jyvät; Kokonainen (kuorimaton); Muu
da: Produktform for boghvede: Kogepose; Flager; Mel; Gryn; Afskallede gryn; Instant; Puffet; Hurtigkogende; Ristede gryn (kasha); Spirede kerner; Hele (uafskallede); Andet
ru: Форма продукта (гречиха): В пакетиках для варки; Хлопья; Мука; Крупа; Ядрица; Быстрого приготовления; Воздушные зерна; Быстроразваривающаяся; Обжаренная ядрица (каша); Пророщенные зерна; Цельная (неочищенная); Другое
ko: 메밀 제품 형태: 보일 인 백; 플레이크; 가루; 그리츠; 탈각 메밀쌀; 인스턴트; 퍼프; 퀵 쿠킹; 구운 메밀쌀(카샤); 발아 알곡; 통메밀(미탈각); 기타
pl: Forma produktu gryczanego: W woreczku do gotowania; Płatki; Mąka; Grysy; Kasza łuskana; Błyskawiczna; Preparowana; Szybkogotująca; Kasza palona; Skiełkowane ziarna; Cała (niełuskana); Inna
zh-CN: 荞麦产品形态: 袋装水煮; 谷片; 粉; 碎粒; 去壳去皮荞麦; 速溶; 膨化; 速煮; 烤碎粒（卡莎）; 发芽谷粒; 全谷（未去壳）; 其他
pt-PT: Forma do produto de trigo sarraceno: Ferver no saco; Flocos; Farinha; Sêmola; Grãos descascados; Instantâneo; Tufado; Cozedura rápida; Grãos tostados (kasha); Grãos germinados; Inteiro (com casca); Outro
ja: そば商品形状: ボイルインバッグ; フレーク; そば粉; 粗挽き粉 (グリッツ); むき実 (グローツ); インスタント; パフ; 早ゆで; ローストグローツ (カーシャ); 発芽種子; 丸ごと (殻付き); その他